Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
CHAPTER 7 Pesticides in Public Buildings

8-7-1.
Use or application of pesticides in public buildings; notice; material safety data sheets; penalty.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agency” means the State of Georgia and any branch, department, agency, division, board, bureau, entity, official, employee, or agent of the state and any county, municipality, school district, consolidated government, or authority created by or pursuant to the Constitution of the State of Georgia or any general or local law of this state and any official, employee, or agent of any such entity.

“Building operator” means the owner, the owner’s agent, or the building manager of any public building or, in the case of a public building which is leased to a tenant who is responsible for the operation of the building, the tenant or the tenant’s building manager.

“Fumigant” means any substance which by itself or in combination with any other substance emits or liberates a gas or gases, fumes, or vapors, which gas or gases, fumes, or vapors when liberated and used will destroy vermin, rodents, insects, and other pests, but are usually lethal, poisonous, noxious, or dangerous to human life.

“Insecticides” means substances, not fumigants, under whatever name known, used for the destruction or control of insects and similar pests.

“Pesticide” means attractants, fumigants, fungicides, insecticides, rodenticides, and repellants.

“Public building” means a building owned or leased by an agency, which is open to the public, including but not limited to the following:

Any building which provides facilities or shelter for public use or assembly or which is used for educational, office, or institutional purposes; and

Any library, museum, school, hospital, auditorium, dormitory, or university building.

“Repellants” means substances, not fumigants, under whatever name known, which may be toxic to insects and related pests, but generally employed because of their capacity for preventing the entrance or attack of pests.

“Rodenticides” means substances, not fumigants, under whatever name known, whether poisonous or otherwise, used for the destruction or control of rodents.

The building operator of any public building who personally applies or uses or who contracts for or orders the application within the interior of any public building of any pesticide requiring the direct supervision of a certified operator as defined in Code Section 43-45-2 or any pesticide which is sold solely for commercial applicator use and is restricted to uses other than household use shall post a conspicuous notice in such public building to notify anyone entering such building that a pesticide is being applied. If such pesticide or pesticides are applied on a regular basis or according to a schedule, such notice may be permanently displayed and shall include the days or dates on which such pesticide or pesticides are usually applied. If the pesticide or pesticides are not applied on a regular basis or according to a schedule or if the pesticides are applied on a day or date other than the day or date contained on a permanently displayed notice, such notice shall be posted before the application of any pesticide and shall remain posted for 24 hours following the application. Such notice shall include a notice of the location and hours during which any person may obtain information concerning the pesticides applied or to be applied and inspect and copy the material safety data sheet. Any such notice shall also include one or more telephone numbers for the building operator at which emergency information concerning the pesticides applied may be obtained at any time during the day or night and on any day of the year. It shall be the duty of the building operator to make available, upon request and within a reasonable period of time of said request, the name of any pesticide used and a copy of the appropriate material safety data sheet. If the pesticide is to be applied by a commercial applicator, a certified operator as defined in Code Section 43-45-2, or a pesticide contractor, it shall be the duty of such applicator or contractor to provide material safety data sheets to the building operator at the time the contract for service is entered or renewed. If any additional pesticides are used after the contract for service is entered, the additional material safety data sheets shall be provided to the building operator. A building operator shall retain for five years all material safety data sheets and other documents furnished pursuant to the preceding sentence. A building operator shall retain statements of information for two years as required by the rules and regulations required by Chapter 45 of Title 43, known as the “Structural Pest Control Act.”

Any person violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, provided that the penalty for a first offense shall be a fine not to exceed $100.00.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-7-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 679, § 1.